test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VINIT_aagim_gt-norm.yaml
     2+aagim+Pej+21+Pret: gidaagimishinaaniban
     2+aagim+Pej+21+VocPl: [gidaagimishinaanidig, gidaagimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gidaagimishiwaaban
     2+aagim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaagimishiwaadig, gidaagimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Pej+3Obv+Pret: odaagimishiniiban
     3+aagim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [odaagimishiniidig, odaagimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Pej+3Pl+Pret: odaagimishiwaaban
     3+aagim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [odaagimishiwaadig, odaagimishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nidaagimishinaaning
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nidaagimishinaanin
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nidaagimishinaanig
     2+aagim+Pej+21+Loc: gidaagimishinaaning
     2+aagim+Pej+21+Obv: gidaagimishinaanin
     2+aagim+Pej+21+Pl: gidaagimishinaanig
     2+aagim+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gidaagimishiwaang
     2+aagim+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gidaagimishiwaan
     2+aagim+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gidaagimishiwaag
     3+aagim+Pej+3Obv+Loc: odaagimishiniing
     3+aagim+Pej+3Obv+Obv: odaagimishiniin
     3+aagim+Pej+3Obv+Pl: odaagimishiniig
     3+aagim+Pej+3Pl+Loc: odaagimishiwaang
     3+aagim+Pej+3Pl+Obv: odaagimishiwaan
     3+aagim+Pej+3Pl+Pl: odaagimishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Pej+Pret+Loc: nidaagimishibaniing
     1+aagim+Pej+Pret+Obv: nidaagimishibaniin
     1+aagim+Pej+Pret+Pl: nidaagimishibaniig
     2+aagim+Pej+Pret+Loc: gidaagimishibaniing
     2+aagim+Pej+Pret+Obv: gidaagimishibaniin
     2+aagim+Pej+Pret+Pl: gidaagimishibaniig
     3+aagim+Pej+Pret+Loc: odaagimishibaniing
     3+aagim+Pej+Pret+Obv: odaagimishibaniin
     3+aagim+Pej+Pret+Pl: odaagimishibaniig
     X+aagim+Pej+Pret+Loc: idaagimishibaniing
     X+aagim+Pej+Pret+Obv: idaagimishibaniin
     X+aagim+Pej+Pret+Pl: idaagimishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagim+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaagiminaanibaniing
     1+aagim+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaagiminaanibaniin
     1+aagim+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaagiminaanibaniig
     1+aagim+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaagiminaanidig, nidaagiminaanidog]
     1+aagim+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaagiminaanidig, nidaagiminaanidog]
     1+aagim+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaagiminaanidig, nidaagiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+21+Pret+Loc: gidaagiminaanibaniing
     2+aagim+21+Pret+Obv: gidaagiminaanibaniin
     2+aagim+21+Pret+Pl: gidaagiminaanibaniig
     2+aagim+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagiminaanidig, gidaagiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagiminaanidig, gidaagiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagiminaanidig, gidaagiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaagimiwaabaniing
     2+aagim+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaagimiwaabaniin
     2+aagim+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaagimiwaabaniig
     2+aagim+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimiwaadig, gidaagimiwaadog]
     2+aagim+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimiwaadig, gidaagimiwaadog]
     2+aagim+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimiwaadig, gidaagimiwaadog]
     3+aagim+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaagiminiibaniing
     3+aagim+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaagiminiibaniin
     3+aagim+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaagiminiibaniig
     3+aagim+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaagiminiidig, odaagiminiidog]
     3+aagim+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaagiminiidig, odaagiminiidog]
     3+aagim+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaagiminiidig, odaagiminiidog]
     3+aagim+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaagimiwaabaniing
     3+aagim+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaagimiwaabaniin
     3+aagim+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaagimiwaabaniig
     3+aagim+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimiwaadig, odaagimiwaadog]
     3+aagim+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimiwaadig, odaagimiwaadog]
     3+aagim+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimiwaadig, odaagimiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: aagimenyishibaniing
     aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: aagimenyishibaniin
     aagim+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: aagimenyishibaniig
     aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: aagimensishibaniing
     aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: aagimensishibaniin
     aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: aagimensishibaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nidaagimenyimishinaan
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nidaagimensimishinaan
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+21: gidaagimenyimishinaan
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gidaagimenyimishiwaa
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+21: gidaagimensimishinaan
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gidaagimensimishiwaa
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv: odaagimenyimishini
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl: odaagimenyimishiwaa
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv: odaagimensimishini
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl: odaagimensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nidaagimenyimishiban
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nidaagimenyimishidig, nidaagimenyimishidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nidaagimensimishiban
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nidaagimensimishidig, nidaagimensimishidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: gidaagimenyimishiban
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gidaagimenyimishidig, gidaagimenyimishidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: gidaagimensimishiban
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gidaagimensimishidig, gidaagimensimishidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: odaagimenyimishiban
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [odaagimenyimishidig, odaagimenyimishidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: odaagimensimishiban
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [odaagimensimishidig, odaagimensimishidog]
     X+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: idaagimenyimishiban
     X+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [idaagimenyimishidig, idaagimenyimishidog]
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: idaagimensimishiban
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [idaagimensimishidig, idaagimensimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nidaagimenyimishing
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: nidaagimenyimishan
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nidaagimenyimishag
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nidaagimensimishing
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: nidaagimensimishan
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nidaagimensimishag
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gidaagimenyimishing
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: gidaagimenyimishan
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gidaagimenyimishag
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: gidaagimensimishing
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: gidaagimensimishan
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: gidaagimensimishag
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: odaagimenyimishing
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: odaagimenyimishan
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: odaagimenyimishag
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: odaagimensimishing
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: odaagimensimishan
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: odaagimensimishag
     X+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: idaagimenyimishing
     X+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: idaagimenyimishan
     X+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: idaagimenyimishag
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: idaagimensimishing
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: idaagimensimishan
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: idaagimensimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nidaagimenyiminaaniban
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nidaagimenyiminaanidig, nidaagimenyiminaanidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nidaagimensiminaaniban
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nidaagimensiminaanidig, nidaagimensiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+21+Pret: gidaagimenyiminaaniban
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+21+VocPl: [gidaagimenyiminaanidig, gidaagimenyiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gidaagimenyimiwaaban
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaagimenyimiwaadig, gidaagimenyimiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+21+Pret: gidaagimensiminaaniban
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+21+VocPl: [gidaagimensiminaanidig, gidaagimensiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gidaagimensimiwaaban
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaagimensimiwaadig, gidaagimensimiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pret: odaagimenyiminiiban
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [odaagimenyiminiidig, odaagimenyiminiidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pret: odaagimenyimiwaaban
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [odaagimenyimiwaadig, odaagimenyimiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Pret: odaagimensiminiiban
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [odaagimensiminiidig, odaagimensiminiidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Pl+Pret: odaagimensimiwaaban
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [odaagimensimiwaadig, odaagimensimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nidaagimenyiminaaning
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nidaagimenyiminaanin
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nidaagimenyiminaanig
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nidaagimensiminaaning
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nidaagimensiminaanin
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nidaagimensiminaanig
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+21+Loc: gidaagimenyiminaaning
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+21+Obv: gidaagimenyiminaanin
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+21+Pl: gidaagimenyiminaanig
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gidaagimenyimiwaang
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gidaagimenyimiwaan
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pl: gidaagimenyimiwaag
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+21+Loc: gidaagimensiminaaning
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+21+Obv: gidaagimensiminaanin
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+21+Pl: gidaagimensiminaanig
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gidaagimensimiwaang
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gidaagimensimiwaan
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pl: gidaagimensimiwaag
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Obv+Loc: odaagimenyiminiing
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Obv+Obv: odaagimenyiminiin
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pl: odaagimenyiminiig
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Pl+Loc: odaagimenyimiwaang
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Pl+Obv: odaagimenyimiwaan
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pl: odaagimenyimiwaag
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Loc: odaagimensiminiing
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Obv: odaagimensiminiin
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Pl: odaagimensiminiig
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Pl+Loc: odaagimensimiwaang
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Pl+Obv: odaagimensimiwaan
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+3Pl+Pl: odaagimensimiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: nidaagimenyimibaniing
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: nidaagimenyimibaniin
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: nidaagimenyimibaniig
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: nidaagimensimibaniing
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: nidaagimensimibaniin
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: nidaagimensimibaniig
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: gidaagimenyimibaniing
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: gidaagimenyimibaniin
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: gidaagimenyimibaniig
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: gidaagimensimibaniing
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: gidaagimensimibaniin
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: gidaagimensimibaniig
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: odaagimenyimibaniing
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: odaagimenyimibaniin
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: odaagimenyimibaniig
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: odaagimensimibaniing
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: odaagimensimibaniin
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: odaagimensimibaniig
     X+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: idaagimenyimibaniing
     X+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: idaagimenyimibaniin
     X+aagim+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: idaagimenyimibaniig
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: idaagimensimibaniing
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: idaagimensimibaniin
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: idaagimensimibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     1+aagim+Con+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nidaagimenyishinaaniban
     1+aagim+Con+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nidaagimenyishinaanidig, nidaagimenyishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nidaagimensishinaaniban
     1+aagim+Dim+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nidaagimensishinaanidig, nidaagimensishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+21+Pret: gidaagimenyishinaaniban
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+21+VocPl: [gidaagimenyishinaanidig, gidaagimenyishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gidaagimenyishiwaaban
     2+aagim+Con+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaagimenyishiwaadig, gidaagimenyishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+Pret: gidaagimensishinaaniban
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl: [gidaagimensishinaanidig, gidaagimensishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gidaagimensishiwaaban
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaagimensishiwaadig, gidaagimensishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret: odaagimenyishiniiban
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [odaagimenyishiniidig, odaagimenyishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret: odaagimenyishiwaaban
